Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the State Forestry Department, for the  biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Agency administration..............  $ 3,000,000
(2) Fire protection..........................  $ 47,165,345
(3) Private forests ..........................  $ 16,949,333
(4) Debt service ..............................  $ 2,740,071
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal funds from the  United States Forest Service for fire protection and for re-
search projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section,
collected or received by the State Forestry Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Agency administration .............. $ 35,626,463
(2) Fire protection .......................... $ 73,073,033
(3) State forests ............................. $ 92,937,670
(4) Private forests .......................... $ 10,777,171
(5) Capital improvement................. $ 4,608,658
(6) Debt service .............................. $ 692,528
(7) Equipment pool......................... $ 16,653,089
(8) Facilities maintenance
and management ....................... $ 5,435,565
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,606,595 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  State Forestry Department for debt service relating to the
purchase of land in the Gilchrist Forest.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
Enrolled Senate Bill 5519 (SB 5519-A) Page 1
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2017 Act, col-
lected or received by the State Forestry Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Agency administration .............. $ 2,635,870
(2) Fire protection .......................... $ 16,952,149
(3) State forests ............................. $ 896,874
(4) Private forests .......................... $ 13,667,673
SECTION 5. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $6,000,000, to be allocated to  the State Forestry Department for fire
protection expenses.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2017, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 6. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate July 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5519 (SB 5519-A) Page 2